Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.102

Criminal justice training commission—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in the Washington state criminal justice training commission to two confidential secretaries involved in managing the confidential records under RCW 43.101.135 and 43.101.400.

[ 2021 c 323 s 26.]